Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.556 and 2021 c 199 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Funding for the program of early learning established under this chapter must be appropriated to the department. The department shall distribute funding to approved early childhood education and assistance program contractors on the basis of eligible children enrolled.(2) ((The program shall be implemented in phases, so that full implementation is achieved in the 2026-27 school year.(3) Funding shall continue to be phased in each year until full statewide implementation of the early learning program is achieved in the 2026-27 school year, at which time any eligible child is entitled to be enrolled in the program. Entitlement under this section is voluntary enrollment.(4))) School districts and approved community-based early learning providers may contract with the department to provide services under the program. The department shall collaborate with school districts, community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote an adequate supply of approved providers.Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.802 and 2024 c 225 s 1 and 2024 c 67 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to increase working families' access to affordable, high quality child care and to support the expansion of the workforce to support businesses and the statewide economy.(2) A family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is at or below 60 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(3) ((Beginning July 1, 2025, a family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is above 60 percent and at or below 75 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(4) Beginning July 1, 2027, and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, a family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is above 75 percent of the state median income and is at or below 85 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(5))) Beginning November 1, 2024, when an applicant or consumer is a member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program the department must determine that the household income eligibility requirements in this section are met.(((6)))(4) The department must adopt rules to implement this section, including an income phase-out eligibility period.(((7)))(5) The department may not consider the citizenship status of an applicant or consumer's child when determining eligibility for working connections child care benefits.(((8)))(6) The income eligibility requirements in subsection((s)) (2) ((through (4))) of this section do not apply to households eligible for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.808, 43.216.810, 43.216.812, and 43.216.814.Sec. 3. RCW 74.62.030 and 2023 c 289 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The aged, blind, or disabled assistance program shall provide financial grants to persons in need who:(i) Are not eligible to receive ((supplemental security income, refugee cash assistance, temporary assistance for needy families, or state family assistance benefits))federal aid assistance, other than basic food benefits transferred electronically and medical assistance;(ii) Meet the eligibility requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and(iii) Are aged, blind, or disabled. For purposes of determining eligibility for assistance for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, the following definitions apply:(A) "Aged" means age 65 or older.(B) "Blind" means statutorily blind as defined for the purpose of determining eligibility for the federal supplemental security income program.(C) "Disabled" means likely to meet the federal supplemental security income disability standard. In making this determination, the department should give full consideration to the cumulative impact of an applicant's multiple impairments, an applicant's age, and vocational and educational history.In determining whether a person is disabled, the department may rely on, but is not limited to, the following:(I) A previous disability determination by the social security administration or the disability determination service entity within the department; or(II) A determination that an individual is eligible to receive optional categorically needy medicaid as a disabled person under the federal regulations at 42 C.F.R. Parts 435, Secs. 201(a)(3) and 210.(b) The following persons are not eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program:(i) Persons who are not able to engage in gainful employment due primarily to a substance use disorder. These persons shall be referred to appropriate assessment, treatment, or shelter services. Referrals shall be made at the time of application or at the time of eligibility review. This subsection may not be construed to prohibit the department from granting aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits to persons with a substance use disorder who are incapacitated due to other physical or mental conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program; or(ii) Persons for whom there has been a final determination of ineligibility based on age, blindness, or disability for federal supplemental security income benefits.(c) Persons may receive aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits and essential needs and housing program support under RCW 43.185C.220 concurrently while pending application for federal supplemental security income benefits. ((Effective October 1, 2025, a person's receipt of supplemental security income received for the same period as aged, blind, or disabled program assistance as described in this section shall not be considered a debt due to the state and is not subject to recovery. However, the))The monetary value of any aged, blind, or disabled ((cash)) assistance ((paid prior to October 1, 2025,))benefit that is subsequently duplicated by the person's receipt of supplemental security income for the same period shall be considered a debt due to the state and shall by operation of law be subject to recovery through all available legal remedies.(2) The pregnant women assistance program shall provide financial grants to persons who:(a) Are pregnant and in need, based upon the current income and resource standards of the federal temporary assistance for needy families program, but are ineligible for federal temporary assistance for needy families or state family assistance benefits for a reason other than failure to cooperate in program requirements; and(b) Meet the eligibility requirements of subsection (3) of this section.(3) To be eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program under subsection (1) of this section or the pregnant women assistance program under subsection (2) of this section, a person must:(a) Be a citizen or alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of law, or be a victim of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005;(b) Meet the income and resource standards described in RCW 74.04.805(1) (d) and (e);(c)(i) Have furnished the department with their social security number. If the social security number cannot be furnished because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a number shall be made prior to authorization of benefits, and the social security number shall be provided to the department upon receipt;(ii) This requirement does not apply to victims of human trafficking as defined in RCW 74.04.005 if they have not been issued a social security number;(d) Not have refused or failed without good cause to participate in substance use treatment if an assessment by a certified substance use disorder professional indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause must be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as determined by the department, prevents the person from participating in substance use treatment, when needed outpatient treatment is not available to the person in the county of their residence, when needed inpatient treatment is not available in a location that is reasonably accessible for the person, or when the person is a parent or other relative personally providing care for a minor child or an incapacitated individual living in the same home as the person, and child care or day care would be necessary for the person to participate in substance use disorder treatment, and such care is not available; and(e) Not have refused or failed to cooperate in obtaining federal aid assistance, without good cause.(4) Referrals for essential needs and housing support under RCW 43.185C.220 shall be provided to persons found eligible under RCW 74.04.805.(5) No person may be considered an eligible individual for benefits under this section with respect to any month if during that month the person:(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from which the person flees; or(b) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision, or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.(6) The department must share client data for individuals eligible for essential needs and housing support with the department of commerce and designated essential needs and housing support entities as required under RCW 43.185C.230.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.216.828 (Child care subsidy ratesâUse of cost model) and 2021 c 199 s 301 & 2019 c 368 s 7;(2) RCW 74.08A.035 (Income eligibilityâChild support) and 2024 c 174 s 2;(3) 2024 c 174 s 1; and(4) 2024 c 174 s 4 (uncodified).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---